North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 4. Paroles.

§§ 148-50 through 148-51.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1955, c. 867, s. 13.

§ 148-51.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 226, s. 9.

§ 148-52.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 10.

Cross References.

As to transfer of the functions of the Board of Paroles to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, see

G.S. 143B-704

.

§ 148-52.1.
Prohibited political activities of member of Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission.

No member of the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall be permitted to use his position to influence elections or the political action of any person, serve as a member of the campaign committee of any political party, interfere with or participate in the preparation for any election or the conduct thereof at the polling place, or be in any manner concerned in the demanding, soliciting or receiving of any assessments, subscriptions or contributions, whether voluntary or involuntary, to any political party. Any Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission member who shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall be subject to dismissal from office.

History.

1953, c. 17, s. 4; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1981, c. 260; 1993, c. 538, s. 44; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Preventive Justice:
How Algorithms, Parole Boards, and Limited Retributivism Could End Mass Incarceration,” see 56 Wake Forest L. Rev. 97 (2021).

State Government Reorganization.

The Board of Paroles was transferred to the Department of Social Rehabilitation and Control by former G.S. 143A-168, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864, and repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 10. The functions of the Department of Social Rehabilitation and Control have been transferred to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. See

G.S. 143B-704

.

§ 148-53.
Investigators and investigations of cases of prisoners. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

For the purpose of investigating the cases of prisoners, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint an adequate staff of competent investigators, particularly qualified for such work, with such reasonable clerical assistance as may be required, who shall, under the rules and regulations duly adopted by the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission, investigate all cases designated by it, investigate cases of prisoners eligible for post-release supervision, and otherwise aid the Commission in passing upon the question of the parole and post-release supervision of prisoners, to the end that every prisoner in the custodial care of the State may receive full, fair, and just consideration.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 3; 1955, c. 867, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 704, s. 3; c. 711, s. 30; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 1993, c. 538, s. 45; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(gggggggg).

§ 148-53.
Investigators and investigations of cases of prisoners. [Effective January 1, 2023]

For the purpose of investigating the cases of prisoners, the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint an adequate staff of competent investigators, particularly qualified for such work, with such reasonable clerical assistance as may be required, who shall, under the rules and regulations duly adopted by the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission, investigate all cases designated by it, investigate cases of prisoners eligible for post-release supervision, and otherwise aid the Commission in passing upon the question of the parole and post-release supervision of prisoners, to the end that every prisoner in the custodial care of the State may receive full, fair, and just consideration.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 3; 1955, c. 867, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 704, s. 3; c. 711, s. 30; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 1993, c. 538, s. 45; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(gggggggg); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t).

§ 148-54.
Parole and post-release supervision supervisors provided for; duties. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is hereby authorized to appoint a sufficient number of competent parole and post-release supervision supervisors, who shall be particularly qualified for and adapted for the work required of them, and who shall under the direction of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, and under regulations prescribed by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety after consultation with the Commission, exercise supervision and authority over paroled prisoners and persons on post-release supervision, assist paroled prisoners and persons on post-release supervision, and those who are to be paroled or released for post-release supervision in finding and retaining self-supporting employment, and to promote rehabilitation work with paroled and post-release supervised prisoners, to the end that they may become law-abiding citizens. The supervisors shall also, under the direction of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, maintain frequent contact with paroled and post-release supervised prisoners and find out whether or not they are observing the conditions of their paroles or post-release supervision, and assist them in every possible way toward compliance with the conditions, and they shall perform such other duties in connection with paroled prisoners as the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may require. The number of supervisors may be increased by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety as and when the number of paroled and post-release supervised prisoners to be supervised requires or justifies such increase.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 4; 1955, c. 867, s. 11; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 704, s. 4; 1993, c. 538, s. 46; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhhh).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhhh), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-54.
Parole and post-release supervision supervisors provided for; duties. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction is hereby authorized to appoint a sufficient number of competent parole and post-release supervision supervisors, who shall be particularly qualified for and adapted for the work required of them, and who shall under the direction of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction, and under regulations prescribed by the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction after consultation with the Commission, exercise supervision and authority over paroled prisoners and persons on post-release supervision, assist paroled prisoners and persons on post-release supervision, and those who are to be paroled or released for post-release supervision in finding and retaining self-supporting employment, and to promote rehabilitation work with paroled and post-release supervised prisoners, to the end that they may become law-abiding citizens. The supervisors shall also, under the direction of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction, maintain frequent contact with paroled and post-release supervised prisoners and find out whether or not they are observing the conditions of their paroles or post-release supervision, and assist them in every possible way toward compliance with the conditions, and they shall perform such other duties in connection with paroled prisoners as the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction may require. The number of supervisors may be increased by the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction as and when the number of paroled and post-release supervised prisoners to be supervised requires or justifies such increase.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 4; 1955, c. 867, s. 11; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 704, s. 4; 1993, c. 538, s. 46; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhhh); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhhh), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-54.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1955, c. 867, s. 13.

§ 148-55.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 10.

§ 148-56.
Assistance in supervision of parolees or post-release supervisees and preparation of case histories.

Upon request by the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission, the county directors of social services shall assist in the supervision of parolees and shall prepare and submit to the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission case histories or other information in connection with any case under consideration for parole or some form of executive clemency.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 6; 1955, c. 867, s. 9; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1993, c. 538, s. 47; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b).

§ 148-57.
Rules and regulations for parole consideration. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to set up and establish rules and regulations in accordance with which prisoners eligible for parole consideration may have their cases reviewed and by which such proceedings may be initiated and considered. That the rules and regulations shall include but not be limited to, a plan whereby the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission may determine parole eligibility, and, when eligibility is so approved, provide for parole of a prisoner to a plan approved by the Secretary of Public Safety.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 7; 1955, c. 867, s. 4; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 704, s. 2; 1993, c. 538, s. 48; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

§ 148-57.
Rules and regulations for parole consideration. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to set up and establish rules and regulations in accordance with which prisoners eligible for parole consideration may have their cases reviewed and by which such proceedings may be initiated and considered. That the rules and regulations shall include but not be limited to, a plan whereby the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission may determine parole eligibility, and, when eligibility is so approved, provide for parole of a prisoner to a plan approved by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 7; 1955, c. 867, s. 4; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 704, s. 2; 1993, c. 538, s. 48; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

§ 148-57.1.
Restitution as a condition of parole or post-release supervision.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 474, s. 5.

As a rehabilitative measure, the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission is authorized to require a prisoner to whom parole or post-release supervision is granted to make restitution or reparation to an aggrieved party as a condition of parole or post-release supervision when the sentencing court recommends that restitution or reparation to an aggrieved party be made a condition of any parole or post-release supervision granted the defendant. When imposing restitution as a condition and setting up a payment schedule for the restitution, the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall take into consideration the resources of the defendant, including all real and personal property owned by the defendant and the income derived from such property, his ability to earn, and his obligation to support dependents. The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall not be bound by such recommendation, but if it elects not to implement the recommendation, it shall state in writing the reasons therefor, and shall forward the same to the sentencing court.

When an active sentence is imposed, the court shall consider whether, as a rehabilitative measure, it should recommend to the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission that restitution or reparation by the defendant be made a condition of any parole or post-release supervision granted the defendant. If the court determines that restitution or reparation should not be recommended, it shall so indicate on the commitment. If, however, the court determines that restitution or reparation should be recommended, the court shall make its recommendation a part of the order committing the defendant to custody. The recommendation shall be in accordance with the applicable provisions of Article 81C of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare and distribute forms which provide ample space to make restitution or reparation recommendations incident to commitments, which forms shall be conveniently structured to enable the sentencing court to make its recommendation.If the offense is one in which there is evidence of physical, mental or sexual abuse of a minor, the court may order, as a condition of parole or post-release supervision, that the defendant pay the cost of any rehabilitative treatment for the minor.

The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall establish rules and regulations to implement this section, which shall include adequate notice to the prisoner that the payment of restitution or reparation by the prisoner is being considered as a condition of any parole or post-release supervision granted the prisoner, and opportunity for the prisoner to be heard. Such rules and regulations shall also provide additional methods whereby facts may be obtained to supplement the recommendation of the sentencing court.

History.

1977, c. 614, s. 8; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 36; 1985, c. 474, s. 5; 1987, c. 397, s. 4; c. 598, s. 4; 1993, c. 538, s. 49; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 1998-212, s. 19.4(h).

Legal Periodicals.

For article on plea bargaining statutes and practices in North Carolina, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 477 (1981).

§§ 148-58,
148-58.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

§ 148-59.
Duties of clerks of superior courts as to commitments; statements filed with Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The several clerks of the superior courts shall attach to the commitment of each prisoner sentenced in such courts a statement furnishing such information as the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall by regulations prescribe, which information shall contain, among other things, the following:

The court in which the prisoner was tried;

The name of the prisoner and of all codefendants;

The date or session when the prisoner was tried;

The offense with which the prisoner was charged and the offense for which convicted;

The judgment of the court and the date of the beginning of the sentence;

The name and address of the presiding judge;

The name and address of the prosecuting solicitor;

The name and address of private prosecuting attorney, if any;

The name and address of the arresting officer;

All available information of the previous criminal record of the prisoner; and

For all Class G or more serious felonies, the names and addresses of the following persons, where the presiding judge makes a finding of such facts:

Any victims of the offense for which the prisoner was convicted;

The parent or legal guardian of any minor victims of the offense for which the prisoner was convicted; and

The next of kin of any homicide victims of the offense for which the prisoner was convicted.The prison authorities receiving the prisoner for the beginning of the service of sentence shall detach from the commitment the statement furnishing such information and forward it to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, together with any additional information in the possession of such prison authorities relating to the previous criminal record of such prisoner, and the information thus furnished shall constitute the foundation and file of the prisoner’s case. Forms for furnishing the information required by this section shall, upon request, be furnished to the said clerks by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety without charge.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 9; 1953, c. 17, s. 2; 1955, c. 867, s. 12; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1973, c. 108, s. 90; c. 1262, s. 10; 1993, c. 538, s. 50; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 12, s. 2; c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(iiiiiiii).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-59

.

§ 148-59.
Duties of clerks of superior courts as to commitments; statements filed with Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The several clerks of the superior courts shall attach to the commitment of each prisoner sentenced in such courts a statement furnishing such information as the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall by regulations prescribe, which information shall contain, among other things, the following:

The court in which the prisoner was tried;

The name of the prisoner and of all codefendants;

The date or session when the prisoner was tried;

The offense with which the prisoner was charged and the offense for which convicted;

The judgment of the court and the date of the beginning of the sentence;

The name and address of the presiding judge;

The name and address of the prosecuting solicitor;

The name and address of private prosecuting attorney, if any;

The name and address of the arresting officer;

All available information of the previous criminal record of the prisoner; and

For all Class G or more serious felonies, the names and addresses of the following persons, where the presiding judge makes a finding of such facts:

Any victims of the offense for which the prisoner was convicted;

The parent or legal guardian of any minor victims of the offense for which the prisoner was convicted; and

The next of kin of any homicide victims of the offense for which the prisoner was convicted.The prison authorities receiving the prisoner for the beginning of the service of sentence shall detach from the commitment the statement furnishing such information and forward it to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, together with any additional information in the possession of such prison authorities relating to the previous criminal record of such prisoner, and the information thus furnished shall constitute the foundation and file of the prisoner’s case. Forms for furnishing the information required by this section shall, upon request, be furnished to the said clerks by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction without charge.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 9; 1953, c. 17, s. 2; 1955, c. 867, s. 12; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1973, c. 108, s. 90; c. 1262, s. 10; 1993, c. 538, s. 50; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 12, s. 2; c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(iiiiiiii); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-59

.

§ 148-60.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

§ 148-60.1.
Allowances for paroled prisoner and prisoner on post-release supervision.

Upon the release of any prisoner upon parole or post-release supervision, the superintendent or warden of the institution shall provide the prisoner with suitable clothing and, if needed, an amount of money sufficient to purchase transportation to the place within the State where the prisoner is to reside. The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission may, in its discretion, provide that the prisoner shall upon his release on parole or post-release supervision receive a sum of money of at least forty-five dollars ($45.00).

History.

1953, c. 17, s. 8; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 120(b); 1993, c. 538, s. 51; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b).

§§ 148-60.2 through 148-62.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

§ 148-62.1.
Entitlement of indigent parolee and post-release supervisee to counsel, in discretion of Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission.

Any parolee or post-release supervisee who is an indigent under the terms of G.S. 7A-450(a) may be determined entitled, in the discretion of the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission, to the services of counsel at State expense at a parole revocation hearing at which either:

The parolee or post-release supervisee claims not to have committed the alleged violation of the parole or post-release supervision conditions; or

The parolee or post-release supervisee claims there are substantial reasons which justified or mitigated the violation and make revocation inappropriate, even if the violation is a matter of public record or is uncontested, and that the reasons are complex or otherwise difficult to develop or present; or

The parolee or post-release supervisee is incapable of speaking effectively for himself;

and where the Commission feels, on a case by case basis, that such appointment in accordance with either (1), (2) or (3) above is necessary for fundamental fairness.

If the parolee or post-release supervisee is determined to be indigent and entitled to services of counsel, counsel shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

History.

1973, c. 1116, s. 2; 1993, c. 538, s. 52; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2000-144, s. 45.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on probation and parole revocation procedures and related issues, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 5 (1977).

§ 148-63.
Arrest powers of police officers.

Any officer who is authorized to make arrests of fugitives from justice shall have full authority and power to arrest any parolee whose parole has been revoked or any post-release supervisee who has been revoked.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 13; 1993, c. 538, s. 53; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b).

§ 148-64.
Cooperation of prison and parole officials and employees. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The officials and employees of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall at all times cooperate with and furnish each other such information and assistance as will promote the purposes of this Chapter and the purposes for which these agencies were established. The Commission shall have free access to all prisoners.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 14; 1955, c. 867, s. 7; 1967, c. 996, ss. 11, 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1993, c. 538, s. 54; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjjj).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-64

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjjj), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” near the beginning of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-64.
Cooperation of prison and parole officials and employees. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The officials and employees of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall at all times cooperate with and furnish each other such information and assistance as will promote the purposes of this Chapter and the purposes for which these agencies were established. The Commission shall have free access to all prisoners.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 14; 1955, c. 867, s. 7; 1967, c. 996, ss. 11, 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1993, c. 538, s. 54; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjjj); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-64

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjjj), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” near the beginning of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-64.1.
Early conditional release of inmates subject to a removal order; revocation of release. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Eligibility for Early Release. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission may conditionally release an inmate into the custody and control of United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety has received a final order of removal for the inmate from United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

The inmate was convicted of a nonviolent criminal offense and is incarcerated for that offense. If the inmate was convicted of and is incarcerated for more than one offense, then all of the offenses of which the inmate was convicted and is incarcerated must be nonviolent criminal offenses. As used in this subdivision, the term “nonviolent criminal offense” means a conviction for an impaired driving offense or a felony violation of any of the following:

G.S. 14-54

.

G.S. 14-56

.

G.S. 14-71.1

.

G.S. 14-100

, where the thing of value is less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

G.S. 90-95(d)(4).

The inmate has served at least half of the minimum sentence imposed by the court or, in the case of an inmate convicted of an impaired driving offense under

G.S. 20-138.1

, the inmate has met all of the parole eligibility requirements under

G.S. 15A-1371

, notwithstanding G.S. 20-179(p)(3).

The inmate was not convicted of an impaired driving offense resulting in death or serious bodily injury, as that term is defined in

G.S. 14-32.4

.

The inmate agrees not to reenter the United States unlawfully.

Release Is Discretionary. — The decision to release an inmate once the requirements of subsection (a) of this section are satisfied is in the sole, unappealable discretion of the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission.

Return of Inmates. — In the event that the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement is unable to or does not deport the inmate, the inmate shall be returned to the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety to serve the remainder of the original sentence.

Unlawful Reentry Constitutes Violation. — An inmate released pursuant to this section who returns unlawfully and willfully to the United States violates the conditions of the inmate’s early release.

Arrest Authority. — An inmate who violates the conditions of the inmate’s early release is subject to arrest by a law enforcement officer.

Effect of Violation. — Upon notification from any federal or state law enforcement agency that the inmate is in custody, and after notice and opportunity to be heard, the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall revoke the inmate’s release and reimprison the inmate for a period equal to the inmate’s maximum sentence minus time already served by the inmate upon a finding that an inmate has violated the conditions of the inmate’s early release.

Violators Ineligible for Future Release. — Upon revocation of release under this subsection, the inmate shall not be eligible for any future release under this section or for any other release from confinement, other than post-release supervision, until the remainder of the sentence of imprisonment is served.

History.

2008-199, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(kkkkkkkk).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-64.1

.

§ 148-64.1.
Early conditional release of inmates subject to a removal order; revocation of release. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Eligibility for Early Release. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission may conditionally release an inmate into the custody and control of United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction has received a final order of removal for the inmate from United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

The inmate was convicted of a nonviolent criminal offense and is incarcerated for that offense. If the inmate was convicted of and is incarcerated for more than one offense, then all of the offenses of which the inmate was convicted and is incarcerated must be nonviolent criminal offenses. As used in this subdivision, the term “nonviolent criminal offense” means a conviction for an impaired driving offense or a felony violation of any of the following:

G.S. 14-54

.

G.S. 14-56

.

G.S. 14-71.1

.

G.S. 14-100

, where the thing of value is less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

G.S. 90-95(d)(4).

The inmate has served at least half of the minimum sentence imposed by the court or, in the case of an inmate convicted of an impaired driving offense under

G.S. 20-138.1

, the inmate has met all of the parole eligibility requirements under

G.S. 15A-1371

, notwithstanding G.S. 20-179(p)(3).

The inmate was not convicted of an impaired driving offense resulting in death or serious bodily injury, as that term is defined in

G.S. 14-32.4

.

The inmate agrees not to reenter the United States unlawfully.

Release Is Discretionary. — The decision to release an inmate once the requirements of subsection (a) of this section are satisfied is in the sole, unappealable discretion of the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission.

Return of Inmates. — In the event that the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement is unable to or does not deport the inmate, the inmate shall be returned to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction to serve the remainder of the original sentence.

Unlawful Reentry Constitutes Violation. — An inmate released pursuant to this section who returns unlawfully and willfully to the United States violates the conditions of the inmate’s early release.

Arrest Authority. — An inmate who violates the conditions of the inmate’s early release is subject to arrest by a law enforcement officer.

Effect of Violation. — Upon notification from any federal or state law enforcement agency that the inmate is in custody, and after notice and opportunity to be heard, the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall revoke the inmate’s release and reimprison the inmate for a period equal to the inmate’s maximum sentence minus time already served by the inmate upon a finding that an inmate has violated the conditions of the inmate’s early release.

Violators Ineligible for Future Release. — Upon revocation of release under this subsection, the inmate shall not be eligible for any future release under this section or for any other release from confinement, other than post-release supervision, until the remainder of the sentence of imprisonment is served.

History.

2008-199, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(kkkkkkkk); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-64.1

.

§ 148-65.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1955, c. 867, s. 13.